Washington statutes.
RCW 39.72.020

Local government indebtedness—Records to be kept—Cancellation of originals.

When a municipal corporation issues a duplicate instrument, as authorized in this chapter, the issuing officer of such municipal corporation shall keep a full and complete record of all warrants, bonds, or other instruments alleged to have been lost or destroyed, which were issued by such municipal corporation, and of the issue of any duplicate therefor; and upon the issuance of any duplicate such officer shall enter upon his or her books the cancellation of the original instrument and immediately notify the treasurer of the county, city or other municipal corporation, the state auditor, and all trustees and paying agencies authorized to redeem such instruments on behalf of the municipal corporation, of such cancellation. The treasurer shall keep a similar list of all warrants, bonds, or other instruments so canceled.

[ 2011 c 336 s 813; 1965 ex.s. c 61 s 5.]